Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201655-605
Military affairs liaison; duties.

(1) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall hire a military affairs liaison for the Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs and fix his or her salary. The department shall provide administrative support to the commission as needed. The liaison shall have military experience and serve at the pleasure of the commission. The liaison shall not be subject to Chapter 81, article 13.

(2) The liaison shall be responsible for the administrative operations of the commission and shall perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned by the commission.

(3) The commission may obtain the services of experts and consultants as necessary to carry out its duties.

Laws 2016, LB754, § 5.
July 21, 2016